Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2469.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "private entity" and "public entity" in section 9102 of Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 9102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Private entity." A person, entity, group or organization that is not the Federal Government, the Commonwealth, a county, a city of the first class, a city of the second class or a <--1234567891011121314151617 municipal authority.* * *"Public entity." A Commonwealth agency as defined in 62 Pa.C.S. § 103 (relating to definitions), a county, a city of the first class, a city of the second class, a municipal authority or an authority created by statute which owns a transportation facility. The term does not include the General Assembly and its members, officers or agencies or any court or other office or agency of the Pennsylvania judicial system.* * *Section 2. Section 9117 of Title 74 is amended to read:SECTION 2. SECTIONS 9105(B)(1), (2.1) AND (3) AND (B.1)(1) AND 9117 OF TITLE 74 ARE AMENDED TO READ:§ 9105. OPERATION OF BOARD.* * *(B) ANALYSIS.--THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(1) THE [DEPARTMENT] PUBLIC ENTITY SHALL DEVELOP A DETAILED ANALYSIS OF A REQUEST OR RECOMMENDATION FOR A PROPOSED TRANSPORTATION PROJECT PRIOR TO REQUESTING APPROVAL BY THE BOARD.* * *(2.1) THE [DEPARTMENT] PUBLIC ENTITY MAY CONDUCT ADDITIONAL EVALUATIONS PRIOR TO THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE ANALYSIS.(3) THE [DEPARTMENT] PUBLIC ENTITY SHALL POST A COPY OF THE ANALYSIS ON THE [DEPARTMENT'S] PUBLIC ENTITY'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE, SUBMIT THE ANALYSIS TO THE BOARD AND THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE AND THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE OF 20260HB2469PN3332 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES AND TRANSMIT NOTICE OF THE ANALYSIS TO THE LEGISLATIVE REFERENCE BUREAU FOR PUBLICATION IN THE PENNSYLVANIA BULLETIN FOR 60 DAYS PRIOR TO ANY ACTION BY THE BOARD.(B.1) PUBLIC INPUT.--THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY:(1) THE [DEPARTMENT] PUBLIC ENTITY SHALL COLLECT COMMENTS FROM THE PUBLIC ON THE PROPOSED TRANSPORTATION PROJECT DURING A PUBLIC COMMENT PERIOD WHICH SHALL COMMENCE WITH THE PUBLICATION OF THE NOTICE IN THE PENNSYLVANIA BULLETIN OF THE ANALYSIS AND SHALL CONTINUE FOR A PERIOD OF NOT LESS THAN 30 DAYS. PRIOR TO ANY ACTION BY THE BOARD, THE [DEPARTMENT] PUBLIC ENTITY SHALL POST A COPY OF ALL SUBMITTED COMMENTS AND A SUMMARY AS PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) ON THE [DEPARTMENT'S] PUBLIC ENTITY'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE AND PROVIDE THE SUBMITTED COMMENTS AND SUMMARY TO THE BOARD AND THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE AND THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.* * *§ 9117. Sovereign immunity.(a) Immunity generally.--Under section 11 of Article I of the Constitution of Pennsylvania, it is declared to be the intent of the General Assembly that [the Commonwealth, and its officials and employees, and a municipal authority, and its officials and employees, acting within the scope of their duties,] the following shall continue to enjoy sovereign immunity and official immunity and remain immune from suit except as provided in section 9118 (relating to specific performance)[.]:20260HB2469PN3332 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The Commonwealth and its officials and employees , ACTING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THEIR DUTIES . (2) A municipal authority and its officials and employees , ACTING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THEIR DUTIES . (3) A county and its officials and employees , ACTING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THEIR DUTIES . (4) A city of the first class and its officials and employees , ACTING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THEIR DUTIES . (5) A city of the second class and its officials and employees , ACTING WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THEIR DUTIES . (b) Claims.--A claim against [the Commonwealth and its officials and employees or municipal authority and its officials and employees] any governmental entity or individual listed under subsection (a) shall be brought only in such manner and in such courts and in such cases as directed by the provision of section 9110(e) (relating to public-private transportation partnership agreement), 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 85 (relating to matters affecting government units), 62 Pa.C.S. Ch. 17 (relating to legal and contractual remedies) or any procurement law applicable to a county, a city of the first class, a city of the second class or a municipal authority.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2469PN3332 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122